lexc-files/positionals.txt
!=================
LEXICON Positional
!=================

asi(AREA):asi        NounPostbaseI;    ! area below; lower part
ilu(AREA):ilu        NounPostbaseI;    ! area inside; interior
kelu(AREA):kelu      NounPostbaseI;    ! area back from sea
kingu(AREA):kingu    NounPostbaseI;    ! back part; stern of boat; time after
sivu(AREA):sivu      NounPostbaseI;    ! front part; bow of boat; time before
saaghw(AREA):saaghw  NounPostbaseII;   ! side; area beside
kelute(AREA):kelute  NounPostbaseVIII; ! area back from sea
kete(AREA):kete      NounPostbaseVIII; ! area toward sea
qule(AREA):qule      NounPostbaseIX;   ! area above

asi(AREA):asi        AlternativeTerminalis; ! area below; lower part
ilu(AREA):ilu        AlternativeTerminalis; ! area inside; interior
kelu(AREA):kelu      AlternativeTerminalis; ! area back from sea
kingu(AREA):kingu    AlternativeTerminalis; ! back part; stern of boat; time after
sivu(AREA):sivu      AlternativeTerminalis; ! front part; bow of boat; time before
saaghw(AREA):saaghw  AlternativeTerminalis; ! side; area beside
kelute(AREA):kelute  AlternativeTerminalis; ! area back from sea
qule(AREA):qule      AlternativeTerminalis; ! area above


!============================
LEXICON AlternativeTerminalis
!============================

^[All.Sg]:^tmun  #; ! toward [Jacobson (2001) p.113]
